Alabama, session 2026rs, HB244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 40-21-83 and 40-21-103 of the Code
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§40-21-83
There are specifically excluded from the gross receipts
or gross sales of a utility, all revenues derived from any of
the following:
(1) The furnishing of utility services which the State
of Alabama is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or
laws of the United States of America or the Constitution of
the State of Alabama of 2022.
(2) The furnishing of utility services which are
otherwise taxed under Sections 40-23-1 to 40-23-36, inclusive.
(3) Wholesale sales.
(4) The furnishing of electricity, natural gas, or
Page 1

(4) The furnishing of electricity, natural gas, or
HB244 Engrossed
domestic water for use or consumption by, in, or for the
direct production, generation, processing, storage, delivery,
or transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic
water.
(5) The furnishing of electricity to a manufacturer or
compounder for use in an electrolytic or electrothermal
manufacturing or compounding process.
(6) The furnishing of natural gas to a manufacturer or
compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
energy.
(7) The furnishing of natural gas to be used by a
manufacturer or compounder to chemically convert raw materials
prior to the use of the converted raw materials in an
electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing or compounding
process.
(8) The use or consumption of electricity by an
incorporated municipality, a board, or corporation organized
under the authority of any incorporated municipality in
furnishing or providing street lighting or traffic-control
systems; the use or consumption of telephone services by an
incorporated municipality in providing fire alarm systems; and
the use or consumption of domestic water by an incorporated
municipality in extinguishing fires, explosions, or
conflagrations.
(9)a. The furnishing of natural gas or electricity for
use or consumption as fuel or energy in and for the heating of
commercial greenhouses, pivot irrigation systems, and poultry
Page 2

commercial greenhouses, pivot irrigation systems, and poultry
HB244 Engrossed
houses.
b. The exclusion provided in this subdivision shall not
include the furnishing of natural gas or electricity for use
or consumption as fuel or energy in the production of
industrial hemp or hemp, as defined in Section 2-8-381, or
cannabis, as defined in Section 20-2A-3.
(10) The furnishing of utility services through the use
of a prepaid telephone calling card."
"§40-21-103
The storage, use, or other consumption of utility
services in the State of Alabama is hereby specifically
excluded from the tax herein levied:
(1) Whenever the State of Alabama is prohibited from
taxing such storage, use, or consumption under the
Constitution or laws of the United States of America or the
Constitution of the State of Alabama of 2022;
(2) Whenever any tax relating to the sale, use,
storage, or consumption of said utility services shall be
levied under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 23 of this
title, or under the provisions of Sections 40-23-1 through
40-23-36 or the Alabama Transaction Tax Act of 1992 if enacted
into law;
(3) Whenever the purchase of said utility services
shall have been at a wholesale sale;
(4) Whenever electricity, natural gas, or domestic
water shall have been used or consumed directly in or for the
production, generation, processing, storage, delivery, or
transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic water;
Page 3

transmission of electricity, natural gas, or domestic water;
HB244 Engrossed
(5) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
compounder in an electrolytic or electrothermal manufacturing
or compounding process;
(6) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used or consumed by a manufacturer or
compounder as a chemical raw material in the manufacturing or
compounding of tangible personal property, but not as fuel or
energy;
(7) Whenever natural gas purchased for storage, use, or
other consumption is used by a manufacturer or compounder to
chemically convert raw materials prior to the use of such
converted raw materials in an electrolytic or electrothermal
manufacturing or compounding process;
(8) Whenever the sales price of said utility services
100 shall be included as a part of the gross receipts or gross
101 sales of a utility subject to the utility gross receipts tax
102 for the purpose of calculating the utility gross receipts tax
103 payable by said utility;
104 (9) Whenever electricity purchased for storage, use, or
105 other consumption is used or consumed in a process for the
106 isotopic enrichment of uranium and when said electricity is
107 purchased from a subsidiary corporation of the corporation
108 engaged in the isotopic enrichment of uranium; and
109 (10) Whenever utility services are furnished through
110 the use of a prepaid telephone calling card; and
111 (11)a. Whenever natural gas or electricity purchased
112 for storage, use, or other consumption is used or consumed as
Page 4

for storage, use, or other consumption is used or consumed as
HB244 Engrossed
113 fuel or energy in commercial greenhouses, pivot irrigation
114 systems, and poultry houses.
115 b. The exclusion provided in this subdivision shall not
116 include natural gas or electricity purchased for storage, use,
117 or other consumption as fuel or energy in the production of
118 industrial hemp or hemp, as defined in Section 2-8-381, or
119 cannabis, as defined in Section 20-2A-3."
120 Section 2. This act shall become effective on
121 September 1, 2026.
Page 5

September 1, 2026.
HB244 Engrossed
122
123
124 House of Representatives
125 Read for the first time and referred ................14-Jan-26
126 to the House of Representatives
127 committee on Ways and Means
128 Education
129
130 Read for the second time and placed ................19-Feb-26
131 on the calendar:
132 1 amendment
133
134 Read for the third time and passed ................24-Feb-26
135 as amended
136 Yeas 102
137 Nays 0
138 Abstains 2
139
140
141 John Treadwell
142 Clerk
143
Page 6